apertium-mos.mos.dix
		<pardef n="tõog/e_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tũ_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>udẽ</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>u-y</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>udame</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>uda</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ume</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ume</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tũnug/i_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tũu/si_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tʋɩɩs/e_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tʋlg/e_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tʋm/e_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tʋʋs/e_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="vaees/e_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="vẽneg/e_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="tõoge">            <i>tõog</i><par n="tõog/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tũ">              <i>tũ</i><par n="tũ_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tũnugi">           <i>tũnug</i><par n="tũnug/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tũusi">             <i>tũu</i><par n="tũu/si_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tʋɩɩse">           <i>tʋɩɩs</i><par n="tʋɩɩs/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tʋlge">            <i>tʋlg</i><par n="tʋlg/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tʋme">             <i>tʋm</i><par n="tʋm/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tʋʋse">            <i>tʋʋs</i><par n="tʋʋs/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="vaeese">           <i>vaees</i><par n="vaees/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="vẽnege">           <i>vẽneg</i><par n="vẽneg/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tõoge">            <i>tõog</i><par n="tõog/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tũ">              <i>tũ</i><par n="tũ_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tũnugi">           <i>tũnug</i><par n="tũnug/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tũusi">             <i>tũu</i><par n="tũu/si_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tʋɩɩse">           <i>tʋɩɩs</i><par n="tʋɩɩs/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tʋlge">            <i>tʋlg</i><par n="tʋlg/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tʋme">             <i>tʋm</i><par n="tʋm/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tʋʋse">            <i>tʋʋs</i><par n="tʋʋs/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="vaeese">           <i>vaees</i><par n="vaees/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="vẽnege">           <i>vẽneg</i><par n="vẽneg/e_vblex"/></e>
